Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-405 Board of governors. (a)
The commissioner shall establish within the bureau, a board of governors for
the purpose of providing expertise and consultation on all matters pertaining
to the operation of the bureau and the joint underwriting plan. The board
shall be composed of:

(1) Five persons from, and members or representatives
of, nationally organized insurers or their domestic insurer affiliates;

(2) One person to represent insurance producers;

(3) Two members, each a self-insurer under this
article, and nominated by all the certified self-insurers in the State;

(4) Two members, not affiliated with the foregoing
organizations, nominated by such nonaffiliated insurers; and

(5) Two members each, to be selected by the
commissioner or nominated by each of the classifications provided for in
section 431:10C-407(b).

(b) The commissioner shall provide, after
consultation with the board, in the budget of the bureau, funds sufficient to
reimburse each member of the board for the actual costs of transportation,
overnight housing, food, and other incidental costs of attending to the
business and meetings of the board. Otherwise, the members shall serve without
compensation.

(c) The board shall elect its chairperson and
vice chairperson annually. The first meeting of the board shall be convened by
the commissioner within sixty days of the effective date of this article.
Thereafter, the board shall meet at its discretion but not less frequently than
quarterly. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; gen ch 1993; am L 2003, c 212, §85]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next